Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Excise Taxes

243.715.
Floor stocks tax on wine and malt beverages for 1954. [Repealed.]

243.720.
Rate of tax.

There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of distilled spirits a tax of one dollar and ninety-two cents ($1.92) on each wine gallon of distilled spirits, and a proportional rate per gallon on all distilled spirits used, sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than one (1) gallon, but the rate of the excise tax on spirits in retail containers of one-half (1/2) pint shall be twelve cents ($0.12); and

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, distilled spirits placed in containers for sale at retail, where the distilled spirits represent six percent (6%) or less of the total volume of the contents of such containers, shall be taxed at the rate of twenty-five cents ($0.25) per gallon.

There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of wine, a tax of fifty cents ($0.50) on each gallon of wine, and a proportional rate per gallon on the wine used, sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than one (1) gallon, but the tax shall not be less than four cents ($0.04) on the sale or distribution of any retail container of wine.

There is levied upon the sale or distribution by sale or gift of malt beverages an excise tax of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) on each barrel of thirty-one (31) gallons and a proportional rate per gallon on malt beverages sold or distributed in any container of more or less than thirty-one (31) gallons;

Each brewer producing malt beverages in this state shall be entitled to a credit of fifty percent (50%) of the tax levied on each barrel of malt beverages sold in this state, up to three hundred thousand (300,000) barrels per annum.

This section shall not apply to:

Wine manufactured, sold, given away, or distributed and used solely for sacramental purposes; or

Distilled spirits and wine purchased by holders of special licenses provided for in KRS

243.320

and purchased and used in the manner authorized by those licenses.

History.

2554b-127, 4281c-2, 4281c-3, 4281c-4: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 100; 1954, ch. 75, § 1; 1970, ch. 21, § 1; 1976, ch. 57, § 1; 1982, ch. 390, § 5, effective June 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 496, § 24, effective August 1, 1986; 2013, ch. 121, § 78, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Although KRS

243.720

was included as being amended in 1982, ch. 244, § 3, amended language was deleted by House Floor Amendment.

243.730.
Reports by wholesalers and distributors or retailers — Applicability of brewers’ tax credit — Due date of tax — Advance payments.

Wholesalers of distilled spirits and wine shall pay and report the tax levied by KRS

243.720

(1) and (2) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which possession or title of the distilled spirits and wine is transferred from the wholesaler to retailers or consumers in this state, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.

Distributors or retailers of malt beverages, who purchase malt beverages directly from a brewer, shall pay and report the tax levied by KRS

243.720

(3) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which the brewer sells, transfers, or passes title of the malt beverage to the distributor or retailer, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth. The credit allowed brewers in this state, under the provisions of KRS 243.720(3)(b), shall flow through to the distributor or retailer who purchases malt beverages directly from the brewer. If a brewer sells, transfers, or passes title to malt beverages to any of its employees for home consumption or to any charitable or fraternal organization pursuant to the provisions of KRS

243.150

, the brewer shall be responsible for paying and reporting the tax levied by KRS 243.720(3) in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.

Every brewer selling, transferring, or passing title to malt beverages to any person in this state other than a distributor or retailer, and every other person selling, transferring, or passing title of distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages to distributors, retailers, or consumers shall report and pay the tax levied by KRS 243.720(1), (2), or (3) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which possession or title of distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages is transferred to a distributor, retailer, or consumer in this state, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.

Every distributor, retailer, or consumer possessing, using, selling, or distributing distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages in this state upon which the tax levied by KRS 243.720(1), (2), or (3) and KRS

243.884

has not been paid shall be jointly and severally liable for reporting and paying the tax due, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth. Such liability shall not be extinguished until the tax has been paid to the Department of Revenue.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, every owner of a small farm winery shall pay and report the tax levied by KRS 243.720 (1) and (2) on a quarterly basis, in accordance with administrative regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.

Every wholesaler of distilled spirits or wine before using, selling, or distributing by sale or gift distilled spirits and wine shall qualify with the Department of Revenue.

Every brewer before selling or distributing by sale or gift malt beverages, or before importing malt beverages into the state, shall qualify with the Department of Revenue in such manner as the Department of Revenue may require.

History.

4281c-24: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 22; 1952, ch. 218, § 2; 1954, ch. 110, § 2; 1960, ch. 186, Art. V, § 1; 1962, ch. 299; 1978, ch. 233, § 23, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 390, § 6, effective June 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 227, § 1, effective August 1, 1992; 1998, ch. 474, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 657, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 179, § 10, effective January 1, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 583, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 79, effective June 25, 2013.

243.740.
Who to pay tax and affix tax stamps. [Repealed.]

243.750.
Purchaser to pay tax, when. [Repealed.]

243.760.
Prohibition of sale, transportation or purchase without stamps. [Repealed.]

243.770.
Stamps affixed to barrels. [Repealed.]

243.780.
Out-of-state vendors may purchase stamps. [Repealed.]

243.790.
Alcoholic beverages — No tax when to be shipped and consumed out of state not subject to tax — Conditions of exemption.

The sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages manufactured in or imported into this state for shipment permanently out of the state to be sold without the state and consumed without the state shall not be subject to the tax imposed by KRS

243.720

. Provided, however, the Department of Revenue may, when necessary for the purpose of control enforcement or protection of revenue, prescribe the conditions under which containers of such alcoholic beverages for shipment permanently out of the state to be sold without the state and consumed without the state may be kept and trafficked in without payment of the tax.

History.

4281c-14: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 162, §§ 3, 4; 2005, ch. 85, § 658, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 13, § 11, effective March 12, 2021.

243.800.
Commissioner to prepare stamps and make them available. [Repealed.]

243.810.
Forging, counterfeiting or altering stamp or writing prohibited. [Repealed.]

243.820.
Cancellation of stamps. [Repealed.]

243.830.
Tax need not be paid more than once; gratuitous stamps. [Repealed.]

243.840.
Unlawful to possess unstamped beverage. [Repealed.]

243.850.
Licensee to report to Department of Revenue on trafficking in alcoholic beverages.

For the purpose of assisting in the enforcement of KRS

243.720

to

243.850

and

243.884

or any amendments thereof, every licensee, except retailers, whether subject to the payment of taxes imposed by said sections or any amendments thereof, shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, render to the Department of Revenue a statement, in writing, of all his trafficking in alcoholic beverages during the preceding month. Such statement shall be taken directly from the records of the reporting licensee, and shall set forth on forms furnished by the Department of Revenue such information as shall be required by it. Such statement shall include alcohol destined for sale outside the state, as well as alcoholic beverages subject to the tax imposed by KRS

243.720

to

243.850

and

243.884

or any amendments thereof. Provided, that the Department of Revenue shall have authority to require from retail licensees and other licensees, other reports and statements at such times as are necessary for the enforcement of KRS 243.720 to 243.850 and 243.884 or any amendments thereof.

History.

4281c-19: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 162, §§ 2, 4; 1982, ch. 390, § 8, effective June 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 496, § 25, effective August 1, 1986; 2005, ch. 85, §
659, effective June 20, 2005.

243.860.
Tax crowns may be used in lieu of stamps. [Repealed.]

243.870.
Withdrawal for personal use of distilled spirits manufactured prior to prohibition. [Repealed.]

243.882.
Definitions for KRS 243.884 to 243.890.

For the purposes of KRS

243.884

to

243.890

:

“Distributor” means a person required to be or who is a licensee authorized to do business pursuant to KRS

243.180

;

“Microbrewery” means a person required to be or who is a licensee authorized to do business pursuant to KRS

243.157

;

“Wholesale sale” or “sale at wholesale” means:

A sale made for the purpose of resale in the regular course of business of beer, wine, or distilled spirits, except as provided in KRS 243.884(3); or

A sale of malt beverages made by a microbrewery as authorized by KRS

243.157

; and

“Wholesaler” means a person required to be or who is a licensee authorized to do business pursuant to KRS

243.160

and

243.170

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 390, §§ 2, 3, effective June 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 451, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2016 ch. 80, § 19, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 16, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 18, amended KRS

243.884

, following a free conference committee for HB 445 to “adjust the tax rates on beer and wine.” In this amendment the internal numbering of KRS

243.884

was changed and subsection (2) was renumbered as subsection (3). An existing reference within KRS 243.884 to “subsection (3) of this section” was changed to “subsection (2)”. However this conforming change was not made to another statute, KRS 243.882(1), which refers to “KRS 243.884(2).” The Reviser of Statutes has made this change to KRS 243.882(1) under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

243.884.
Wholesale sales tax imposed — Rate — Report and payment — Exemptions.

For the privilege of making “wholesale sales” or “sales at wholesale” of beer, wine, or distilled spirits, a tax is hereby imposed upon all wholesalers of wine and distilled spirits, all distributors of beer, all direct shipper licensees shipping alcohol to a consumer at a Kentucky address, all distillers making sales pursuant to KRS

243.0305

(3), (4)(a)1. and 2. and (c), (7), (9), (10), and (12), and all microbreweries selling malt beverages under KRS

243.157

.

Prior to July 1, 2015, the tax shall be imposed at the rate of eleven percent (11%) of the gross receipts of any such wholesaler or distributor derived from “sales at wholesale” or “wholesale sales” made within the Commonwealth, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. For the purposes of this section, the gross receipts of a microbrewery making “wholesale sales” shall be calculated by determining the dollar value amount that the microbrewer would have collected had it conveyed to a distributor the same volume sold to a consumer as allowed under KRS

243.157

(3)(b) and (c).

On and after July 1, 2015, the following rates shall apply:

For distilled spirits, eleven percent (11%) of wholesale sales or sales at wholesale; and

For wine and beer:

Ten and three-quarters of one percent (10.75%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale made on or after July 1, 2015, and before June 1, 2016;

Ten and one-half of one percent (10.5%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale made on or after June 1, 2016, and before June 1, 2017;

Ten and one-quarter of one percent (10.25%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale made on or after June 1, 2017, and before June 1, 2018; and

Ten percent (10%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale made on or after June 1, 2018.

On and after March 12, 2021, the following rates shall apply for direct shipper sales:

For distilled spirits shipments, eleven percent (11%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale; and

For wine and beer shipments, ten percent (10%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale.

For direct shipper sales or sales made pursuant to KRS

243.0305

, if a wholesale price is not readily available, the direct shipper licensee or distillery shall calculate the wholesale price to be seventy percent (70%) of the retail price of the alcoholic beverages.

Wholesalers of distilled spirits and wine, distributors of malt beverages, microbreweries, distillers, and direct shipper licensees shall pay and report the tax levied by this section on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which possession or title of the distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages is transferred from the wholesaler or distributor to retailers, or by microbreweries, distillers, or direct shipper licensees to consumers in this state, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.

Gross receipts from sales at wholesale or wholesale sales shall not include the following sales:

Sales made between wholesalers or between distributors;

Sales from the first fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of wine produced by a small farm winery in a calendar year made by:

The small farm winery; or

A wholesaler of that wine produced by the small farm winery; and

Sales made between a direct shipper licensee and a consumer located outside of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 390, § 4, effective June 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 451, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 660, effective June 20, 2005; ch. 168, § 74, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 179, § 11, effective January 1, 2007; 2014, ch. 102, § 18, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 80, § 20, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 16, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 151, § 77, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 13, § 13, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 11, effective March 29, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Whiteside, Taxation, 71 Ky. L.J. 479 (1982-83).

243.886.
Reimbursement for collecting and reporting — Microbrewery or distiller that pays wholesale sales tax not entitled to reimbursement.

To reimburse himself or herself for the cost of collecting and reporting the tax, each person required to pay and report the tax levied by KRS

243.884

, other than a microbrewery or a distiller, shall deduct on each report one percent (1%) of the tax due, provided the amount due is not delinquent at the time of payment. A microbrewery or distiller that reports and pays the wholesale sales tax levied by KRS

243.884

, in accordance with KRS

243.0305

or

243.157

as applicable, shall not be entitled to deduct one percent (1%) of the tax due.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 390, § 7, effective June 1, 1982; 2018 ch. 16, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 13, § 18, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(11/5/90). The text of this section originated in Senate Committee Substitute No. 2 for 1982 House Bill 571,
see
1982 Senate Journal 2026. In this substitute, Section 4 had two subsections. Floor Amendment No. 4 to this substitute deleted subsection (1) of Section 4 and removed (2) from the remainder of the text.

See

1982 Senate Journal 2207-08. The Senate adopted these two items in its treatment of House Bill 571,

see

1982 Senate Journal 2212, and the Free Conference Committee Report on House Bill 571 subsequently also incorporated this language,

see

1982 Senate Journal 2415, 1982 House Journal 3258-3259. It was in this form that House Bill 571 passed both Houses.

See

1982 Senate Journal 2425, 1982 House Journal 3259. For this reason, the words “subsection (2) of” that appeared before
KRS

243.884

were retained in this section by a manifest clerical error in failing to make the necessary comforming amendment. These words have been deleted by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to
KRS

7.136

.

243.888.
Floor stocks. [Repealed.]

243.890.
Receipts to be used for general fund purposes.

Except as provided in KRS

211.285

, receipts derived from taxes assessed and collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be appropriated for general fund purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 390, § 10, effective June 1, 1982; 1998, ch. 225, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

243.892.
Sales to be made only to licensed retailer — Discounts prohibited. [Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 390, § 12, effective June 1, 1982; repealed by 2016 ch. 80, § 29, effective July 15, 2016.